Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-218
Labor organization, defined.

The term labor organization means any organization of any kind, or any agency or employee representation committee or plan, which exists for the purpose, in whole or in part, of dealing with employers concerning grievances, labor disputes, wages, rates of pay, hours of employment, or conditions of work.

Laws 1947, c. 177, § 2, p. 585.